Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1317.01
Terms and conditions of employment; employees not covered under State Personnel System; adjustments.

Except for employees of the University of Nebraska and the state colleges and except as may be prohibited by the Industrial Relations Act or the State Employees Collective Bargaining Act, terms and conditions of employment which may otherwise be provided by law for employees not covered under the State Personnel System may be adjusted by the employer-representative as defined in section 81-1371 to address changes arising out of collective bargaining, but in no event shall the adjustment exceed the benefits derived from collective bargaining.

Laws 1988, LB 1040, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 309, § 3;

Laws 1990, LB 1125, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 502, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 697, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 395, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 314, § 16;

Laws 1999, LB 113, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 96, § 4.

Industrial Relations Act, see section 48-801.01.

State Employees Collective Bargaining Act, see section 81-1369.